Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-444
Counsel for appellant; appointment.

In every case coming before the Court of Military Review, the Court of Appeals, or the Nebraska Supreme Court under the Nebraska Code of Military Justice, the State Judge Advocate shall appoint counsel to represent the accused and such counsel shall be qualified under section 55-423, except that the accused shall have the right to be represented before the Court of Military Review by civilian counsel if provided by the accused.

Laws 1969, c. 458, § 44, p. 1572;

Laws 1992, LB 360, § 29.